Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINTS 2 Section 1. Section 29C.9, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 10. The commission shall , if agreed to by a two-thirds 5 majority of the commission and a two-thirds majority of the 6 joint 911 service board, be responsible for the emergency 7 telephone system activities of a joint 911 service board if 8 substituted for a joint 911 service board pursuant to section 9 34A.3, subsection 4 required under chapter 34A . 10 Sec. 2. Section 29C.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. Each local emergency management 13 commission, in addition to duties under this chapter and 14 chapter 34A, shall annually submit to the department the 15 following, which the department shall publish on its internet 16 site: 17 a. A five-year plan identifying anticipated 911 service 18 infrastructure needs, upgrades, and improvements. 19 b. An inventory including all of the following: 20 (1) All agency full-time equivalent positions and 21 associated costs. 22 (2) All equipment owned or used by the agency and associated 23 costs. 24 (3) All structures owned or used by the agency and 25 associated costs. 26 (4) All equipment owned by public safety agencies 27 located within the commissionâs jurisdiction, including law 28 enforcement, fire protection, emergency medical services, and 29 the sheriff. 30 Sec. 3. Section 34A.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 31 following new subsection: 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 13A. âLocal emergency management commissionâ 33 means a local emergency management commission established under 34 section 29C.9, acting pursuant to this chapter. 35 -1- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 18 S.F. _____ Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 34A.2B Public safety answering points 1 ââ accessing criminal justice information. 2 A public safety answering point that accesses criminal 3 justice information shall comply with the security policy 4 of the federal bureau of investigationâs criminal justice 5 information services and any requirements imposed by the Iowa 6 department of public safety. Each local emergency management 7 commission shall designate the county sheriff as the official 8 responsible for security, training, and compliance in federal 9 and state criminal justice information systems. 10 Sec. 5. Section 34A.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 34A.3 Joint 911 service board Local emergency management 13 commission ââ 911 service plan ââ implementation ââ waivers . 14 1. Joint 911 service boards Local emergency management 15 commissions ââ plans. 16 a. The board of supervisors of each county shall maintain a 17 joint 911 service board. 18 (1) Each political subdivision of the state having a public 19 safety agency serving territory within the county and each 20 local emergency management agency as defined in section 29C.2 21 operating within the area is entitled to voting membership on 22 the joint 911 service board. For the purposes of this section , 23 a township that operates a volunteer fire department providing 24 fire protection services to the township, or a city which 25 provides fire protection services through the operation of a 26 volunteer fire department not financed through city government, 27 shall be considered a political subdivision of the state 28 having a public safety agency serving territory within the 29 county. Each private safety agency operating within the area 30 is entitled to nonvoting membership on the board. 31 (2) A township that does not operate its own public safety 32 agency, but contracts for the provision of public safety 33 services, is not entitled to membership on the joint 911 34 service board, but its contractor is entitled to membership 35 -2- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 2/ 18 S.F. _____ according to the contractorâs status as a public or private 1 safety agency. 2 (3) The sheriff of each county, or the sheriffâs designee, 3 is entitled to voting membership on the joint 911 service 4 board. 5 (4) The chief of police of each city operating a public 6 safety answering point, or the chief of policeâs designee, is 7 entitled to voting membership on the joint 911 service board of 8 the county where the city is located. 9 b. a. (1) The joint 911 service board local emergency 10 management commission shall maintain a 911 service plan 11 encompassing at minimum the entire county , unless an exemption 12 is granted by the program manager permitting a smaller 13 911 service area . Except as otherwise authorized in this 14 paragraph, not more than one public safety answering point 15 shall provide 911 service within a county. This subsection 16 does not apply to a public safety answering point operated 17 by the national guard, any branch of the armed forces of the 18 United States, or the department of public safety. 19 (2) If a city extends into more than one county, the city, 20 the counties, and the local emergency management commissions 21 serving the city shall enter into an agreement to determine 22 how 911 calls originating from the city are allocated to the 23 public safety answering points in the counties where the city 24 is located. 25 b. Public safety answering points providing 911 26 service within the same county shall at all times maintain 27 communication capabilities with each other and with all public 28 safety agencies within the county, including those providing 29 fire protection, law enforcement, emergency medical services, 30 and the sheriff. 31 c. If a public safety answering point receives and addresses 32 a 911 call originating in an area primarily served by another 33 public safety answering point, the local emergency management 34 commission governing the receiving public safety answering 35 -3- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 3/ 18 S.F. _____ point shall bill the local emergency management commission 1 governing the primary public safety answering point no more 2 than the actual cost of receiving and addressing the call. The 3 payments under this subsection shall be made no later than 4 thirty days after the call is addressed. 5 (1) The program manager may grant a discretionary exemption 6 from the single county minimum service area requirement 7 based upon a joint 911 service boardâs or other 911 service 8 plan operating authorityâs presentation of evidence which 9 supports the requested exemption if the program manager finds 10 that local conditions make adherence to the minimum standard 11 unreasonable or technically infeasible and that the purposes 12 of this chapter would be furthered by granting an exemption. 13 The minimum size requirement is intended to prevent unnecessary 14 duplication of public safety answering points and minimize 15 other administrative, personnel, and equipment expenses. 16 (2) The program manager may order the inclusion of a 17 specific territory not serviced by surrounding 911 service plan 18 areas in an adjoining 911 service plan area upon request of the 19 joint 911 service board representing the territory to avoid 20 the creation by exclusion of a territory smaller than a single 21 county. 22 c. d. The A 911 service plan operating authority shall 23 submit proposed changes to the plan to all of the following: 24 (1) The program manager. 25 (2) Public and private safety agencies in the 911 service 26 area. 27 (3) Local exchange service providers affected by the 911 28 service plan. 29 2. Compliance waivers available in limited circumstances. 30 a. The program manager may extend the time period for plan 31 implementation by issuing a compliance waiver. 32 b. The compliance waiver shall be based upon a joint 33 911 service boardâs local emergency management commissionâs 34 presentation of evidence which that supports an extension 35 -4- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 4/ 18 S.F. _____ if the program manager finds that local conditions make 1 implementation financially unreasonable or technically 2 infeasible by the originally scheduled plan of implementation. 3 c. The compliance waiver shall be for a set period of time, 4 and subject to review and renewal or denial of renewal upon its 5 expiration. 6 d. The waiver may cover all or a portion of a 911 service 7 planâs 911 service area to facilitate phased implementation 8 when possible. 9 e. The granting of a compliance waiver does not create 10 a presumption that the identical or similar waiver will be 11 extended in the future. 12 f. Consideration of compliance waivers shall be on a 13 case-by-case basis. 14 3. Chapter 28E agreement ââ alternative to joint 911 service 15 board. 16 a. A legal entity created pursuant to chapter 28E by a 17 county or counties, other political divisions, and public or 18 private agencies to jointly plan, implement, and operate a 19 countywide, or larger, 911 service system may be substituted 20 for the joint 911 service board required under subsection 1 . 21 An alternative legal entity created pursuant to chapter 28E as 22 a substitute for a joint 911 service board, as permitted by 23 this subsection , may be created by either: 24 (1) Agreement of the parties entitled to voting membership 25 on a joint 911 service board. 26 (2) Agreement of the members of a joint 911 service board. 27 b. An alternative chapter 28E entity has all of the powers 28 of a joint 911 service board and any additional powers granted 29 by the agreement. As used in this chapter , âjoint 911 service 30 boardâ includes an alternative chapter 28E entity created for 31 that purpose, except as specifically limited by the chapter 28E 32 agreement or unless clearly provided otherwise in this chapter . 33 A chapter 28E agreement related to 911 service shall permit 34 the participation of a private safety agency or other persons 35 -5- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 5/ 18 S.F. _____ allowed to participate in a joint 911 service board, but the 1 terms, scope, and conditions of participation are subject to 2 the chapter 28E agreement. 3 4. Local emergency management commission ââ alternative to 4 911 service board. 5 a. Subject to section 29C.9, subsection 10 , a local 6 emergency management commission may be substituted for the 7 joint 911 service board required under subsection 1 by the 8 board of supervisors of the county in which the joint 911 9 service board is maintained. 10 b. A commission shall have all of the powers of a joint 911 11 service board if a commission is substituted for the joint 911 12 service board pursuant to paragraph âaâ . 13 c. As used in this chapter , âjoint 911 service boardâ 14 includes a commission if a commission is substituted for the 15 joint 911 service board pursuant to paragraph âaâ . 16 5. Participation in joint 911 service board required. A 17 political subdivision having a public or private safety agency 18 within its territory or jurisdiction shall participate in a 19 joint 911 service board and cooperate in maintaining the 911 20 service plan. 21 Sec. 6. Section 34A.7, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 22 is amended to read as follows: 23 When a 911 service plan is implemented, the costs of 24 providing 911 service within a 911 service area are the 25 responsibility of the joint 911 service board local emergency 26 management commission and the member political subdivisions. 27 Costs in excess of the amount raised by imposition of the 911 28 service surcharge provided for under subsection 1 shall be 29 paid by the joint 911 service board local emergency management 30 commission from such revenue sources allocated among the 31 member political subdivisions as determined by the joint 911 32 service board local emergency management commission . Funding 33 is not limited to the surcharge, and surcharge revenues may 34 be supplemented by other permissible local and state revenue 35 -6- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 6/ 18 S.F. _____ sources. A joint 911 service board local emergency management 1 commission shall not commit a political subdivision to 2 appropriate property tax revenues to fund a 911 service plan 3 without the consent of the political subdivision. A joint 911 4 service board local emergency management commission may approve 5 a 911 service plan, including a funding formula requiring 6 appropriations by participating political subdivisions, subject 7 to the approval of the funding formula by each political 8 subdivision. However, a political subdivision may agree in 9 advance to appropriate property tax revenues or other moneys 10 according to a formula or plan developed by an alternative 11 chapter 28E entity. Property tax revenues appropriated by a 12 political subdivision under the funding formula for the purpose 13 of supporting public safety answering point operations shall 14 be paid only to the local emergency management commission that 15 operates the primary public safety answering point serving the 16 political subdivision. 17 Sec. 7. Section 34A.11, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 34A.11 Communications ââ single point-of-contact. 20 1. The joint 911 service board local emergency management 21 commission in each 911 service area shall designate a person 22 to serve as a single point-of-contact to facilitate the 23 communication of needs, issues, or concerns regarding emergency 24 communications, interoperability, and other matters applicable 25 to emergency 911 communications and migration to the next 26 generation 911 network. The person designated as the single 27 point-of-contact shall be responsible for facilitating the 28 communication of such needs, issues, or concerns between 29 public or private safety agencies within the service area, 30 the 911 program manager, the 911 communications council, the 31 statewide interoperable communications system board established 32 in section 80.28 , and any other person, entity, or agency the 33 person deems necessary or appropriate. The person designated 34 shall also be responsible for responding to surveys or requests 35 -7- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 7/ 18 S.F. _____ for information applicable to the service area received from a 1 federal, state, or local agency, entity, or board. 2 2. In the event a joint 911 service board local 3 emergency management commission fails to designate a single 4 point-of-contact by November 1, 2013 2026 , the chairperson 5 of the joint 911 service board county sheriff shall serve in 6 that capacity. The 911 service board shall submit the name 7 and contact information for the person designated as the 8 single point-of-contact to the 911 program manager by January 9 1 annually. 10 3. The provisions of this section shall be equally 11 applicable to an alternative legal entity created pursuant to 12 chapter 28E if such an entity is established as an alternative 13 to a joint 911 service board as provided in section 34A.3 . 14 If such an entity is established, the governing body of 15 that entity shall designate the single point-of-contact for 16 the entity, and the chairperson or representative official 17 of the governing body shall serve in the event a single 18 point-of-contact is not designated. 19 Sec. 8. COUNTY CONSOLIDATION ââ TRANSFERS ââ IMPLEMENTATION 20 DEADLINE. 21 1. Each county, each city located within the county, 22 each joint 911 service board existing on the effective date 23 of this Act, and each local emergency management commission 24 shall execute a written agreement indicating their intent to 25 reform or consolidate and describing the manner in which the 26 consolidation will occur under this Act. 27 2. The agreement shall include, when applicable, the 28 transfer of all existing funds, debts, and obligations of 29 joint 911 service boards to the local emergency management 30 commission, a timeline for completion of the consolidation, and 31 any decision concerning existing multicounty agreements. An 32 employee employed by a public safety answering point that is 33 discontinued due to consolidation under this section shall be 34 given a hiring preference for one year following the employeeâs 35 -8- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 8/ 18 S.F. _____ last date of employment with the public safety answering point 1 for any similar position with another public safety answering 2 point in Iowa. This subsection shall not be construed to 3 supersede any collective bargaining agreements. 4 3. The agreement shall be submitted to the department of 5 homeland security and emergency management, which shall publish 6 all agreements on its internet site. 7 4. A total of ninety-nine agreements, one per county, shall 8 be executed. 9 5. If a county is in an agreement, as of the effective 10 date of this Act, to either enter into a joint 911 service 11 board under section 34A.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, or other 12 allowable agreement method, or a joint local emergency 13 management commission under section 29C.9, subsection 11, Code 14 2026, or other allowable agreement method, shall determine 15 with the other counties the county is in current agreements 16 with to either disband entirely or continue in an agreement to 17 consolidate local emergency management commission functions and 18 joint 911 service board functions under a single regionalized 19 local emergency management commission. 20 6. All funds, debts, contract rights, and obligations 21 of each joint 911 service board shall transfer to the local 22 emergency management commission upon the effective date of the 23 agreement executed under this section. 24 7. Agreements required under this section shall be 25 submitted to the department of homeland security and emergency 26 management no later than July 1, 2027. 27 8. All transfers and consolidations required under this Act 28 shall be completed no later than July 1, 2030. 29 Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 30 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 31 DIVISION II 32 CONFORMING CHANGES 33 Sec. 10. Section 16.161, Code 2026, is amended to read as 34 follows: 35 -9- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 9/ 18 S.F. _____ 16.161 Authority to issue 911 program bonds and notes. 1 1. The authority shall assist the program manager, 2 appointed pursuant to section 34A.2A , as provided in chapter 3 34A, subchapter II , and the authority shall have all of the 4 powers delegated to it by a joint 911 service board local 5 emergency management commission or the department of public 6 defense in a chapter 28E agreement with respect to the issuance 7 and securing of bonds or notes and the carrying out of the 8 purposes of chapter 34A . 9 2. The authority shall provide a mechanism for the 10 pooling of funds of two or more joint 911 service boards 11 local emergency management commissions to be used for the 12 joint purchasing of necessary equipment and reimbursement of 13 land-line and wireless service providersâ costs for upgrades 14 necessary to provide 911 service. When two or more joint 911 15 service boards local emergency management commissions have 16 agreed to pool funds for the purpose of purchasing necessary 17 equipment to be used in providing 911 service, the authority 18 shall issue bonds and notes as provided in sections 34A.20 19 through 34A.22 . 20 Sec. 11. Section 34A.2, subsection 5, paragraph d, 21 subparagraph (1), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 A statement of estimated costs to be incurred by the joint 24 911 service board local emergency management commission or the 25 department of public safety, including separate estimates of 26 the following: 27 Sec. 12. Section 34A.7, subsection 1, paragraph b, 28 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 (1) The program manager shall notify a local exchange 30 service provider scheduled to provide exchange access line 31 service to a 911 service area that implementation of a 911 32 service plan has been approved by the joint 911 service board 33 local emergency management commission and that collection of 34 the surcharge is to begin within sixty days. 35 -10- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 10/ 18 S.F. _____ Sec. 13. Section 34A.7, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The surcharge shall be collected as part of the access 3 line service providerâs periodic billing to a subscriber. In 4 compensation for the costs of billing and collection, the local 5 exchange service provider may retain one percent of the gross 6 surcharges collected. If the compensation is insufficient to 7 fully recover a local exchange service providerâs costs for 8 billing and collection of the surcharge, the deficiency shall 9 be included in the local exchange service providerâs costs for 10 ratemaking purposes to the extent it is reasonable and just 11 under section 476.6 . The surcharge shall be remitted to the 12 joint 911 service board local emergency management commission 13 for deposit into the 911 service fund quarterly by the local 14 exchange service provider. The total amount for multiple 15 exchanges may be combined. 16 Sec. 14. Section 34A.7, subsection 2, paragraph c, 17 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 The joint 911 service board local emergency management 20 commission may request, not more than once each quarter, the 21 following information from the local exchange service provider: 22 Sec. 15. Section 34A.7, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 4. 911 service fund. Each joint 911 service board local 25 emergency management commission shall establish and maintain 26 as a separate account a 911 service fund. Any funds remaining 27 in the account at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert 28 to the general funds of the member political subdivisions, 29 except as provided in subsection 5 , but shall remain in the 911 30 service fund. Moneys in a 911 service fund may only be used 31 for nonrecurring and recurring costs of the 911 service plan 32 as approved by the program manager, as those terms are defined 33 by section 34A.2 . 34 Sec. 16. Section 34A.7, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 35 -11- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 11/ 18 S.F. _____ 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 a. Moneys deposited in a 911 service fund shall be used for 2 the repayment of any bonds issued for the benefit of or loan 3 made to the joint 911 service board local emergency management 4 commission pursuant to sections 34A.20 through 34A.22 , and as 5 long as any such bond or loan remains unpaid the surcharge 6 shall not be reduced or eliminated. Moneys deposited in the 7 fund shall be subject to such terms and conditions as may be 8 contained in the relevant bond documents, trust indenture, 9 resolution, loan agreement, or other instrument pursuant to 10 which bonds are issued or a loan is made, without regard to any 11 limitation otherwise provided by law. 12 Sec. 17. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, 13 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 (1) The program manager shall allocate to each joint 911 15 service board local emergency management commission and to the 16 department of public safety a minimum of one thousand dollars 17 per calendar quarter for each public safety answering point 18 within the service area of the department of public safety or 19 joint 911 service board local emergency management commission . 20 Sec. 18. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph b, 21 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (c), Code 2026, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 (c) Notwithstanding subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), the 24 minimum amount allocated to each joint 911 service board local 25 emergency management commission and to the department of public 26 safety shall be no less than one thousand dollars for each 27 public safety answering point within the service area of the 28 department of public safety or joint 911 service board local 29 emergency management commission . 30 Sec. 19. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph d, 31 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 32 (2) The program manager may also provide grants to joint 33 911 service boards local emergency management commissions and 34 the department of public safety for the purpose of developing 35 -12- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 12/ 18 S.F. _____ and maintaining GIS data to be used in support of the next 1 generation 911 network. The program manager shall provide 2 guidelines, application forms, and notice of the availability 3 of such grants on the departmentâs internet site. 4 Sec. 20. Section 34A.7A, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 5 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 g. The director, in consultation with the program manager 7 and the 911 communications council, shall adopt rules pursuant 8 to chapter 17A governing the distribution of the surcharge 9 collected and distributed pursuant to this subsection . The 10 rules shall include provisions that all joint 911 service 11 boards local emergency management commissions and the 12 department of public safety which that answer or service 13 wireless 911 calls are eligible to receive an equitable portion 14 of the receipts. 15 Sec. 21. Section 34A.7A, subsection 5, paragraphs a and c, 16 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 17 a. The program manager, in consultation with the 911 18 communications council and the auditor of state, shall 19 establish a methodology for determining and collecting public 20 safety answering point cost and expense data through the 21 county joint 911 service boards local emergency management 22 commissions . The methodology shall include the collection of 23 data for direct costs and expenses related to the operation 24 of a public safety answering point and account for the extent 25 to which identified costs and expenses are compensated for 26 or addressed through 911 surcharges versus other sources of 27 funding. 28 c. A county joint 911 service board which local emergency 29 management commission that fails to submit expenses and costs 30 pursuant to the methodology developed pursuant to paragraph âaâ 31 by March 31 of each year shall be allocated sixty-five cents 32 out of the one dollar 911 emergency communications service 33 surcharge until March 31 of the following year. Remaining 34 funds shall be held in the carryover operating surplus 35 -13- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 13/ 18 S.F. _____ fund until the expenses and cost report is submitted by the 1 county joint 911 service board local emergency management 2 commission . If the county joint 911 service board local 3 emergency management commission submits the expense and cost 4 report before March 30 of the following year, the set aside 5 funds shall be provided to the county joint 911 service board 6 local emergency management commission . If the county joint 911 7 service board local emergency management commission fails to 8 submit the expense and cost report within one year, funds shall 9 revert to the carryover operating surplus fund and be used in 10 accordance with subsection 2 , paragraph âfâ . 11 Sec. 22. Section 34A.8, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 12 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 b. The director, program manager, joint 911 service board, 14 local emergency management commission established pursuant 15 to section 29C.9 , the designated next generation 911 network 16 service provider, and the public safety answering point, and 17 their agents, employees, and assigns , shall use local exchange 18 service information provided by the local exchange service 19 provider solely for the purposes of providing 911 emergency 20 telephone service or providing related mass notification and 21 emergency messaging services as described in section 29C.17A 22 utilizing only the subscriberâs information, and local exchange 23 service information shall otherwise be kept confidential. 24 A person who violates this paragraph is guilty of a simple 25 misdemeanor. 26 Sec. 23. Section 34A.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 34A.12 Delivery of 911 calls ââ reimbursement. 29 The program manager may request reimbursement from each 30 joint 911 service board local emergency management commission 31 for reasonable costs under section 34A.7A related to the 32 delivery of 911 call traffic to public safety answering 33 points. Upon request, each joint 911 service board local 34 emergency management commission shall reimburse the department 35 -14- LSB 5899XC (1) 91 sb/js 14/ 18 S.F. _____ of homeland security and emergency management for such costs 1 within thirty days. 2 Sec. 24. Section 34A.21, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 c. The amounts on deposit in the 911 service fund of a 5 joint 911 service board local emergency management commission , 6 including , but not limited to revenues from a local option 911 7 service surcharge. 8 Sec. 25. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 9 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10